North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8C. Evidence Code.
Article 8. Hearsay.
Rule 804.
Hearsay exceptions; declarant unavailable.

Definition of unavailability. — “Unavailability as a witness” includes situations in which the declarant:

Is exempted by ruling of the court on the ground of privilege from testifying concerning the subject matter of his statement; or

Persists in refusing to testify concerning the subject matter of his statement despite an order of the court to do so; or

Testifies to a lack of memory of the subject matter of his statement; or

Is unable to be present or to testify at the hearing because of death or then existing physical or mental illness or infirmity; or

Is absent from the hearing and the proponent of his statement has been unable to procure his attendance (or in the case of a hearsay exception under subdivision (b)(2), (3), or (4), his attendance or testimony) by process or other reasonable means.

A declarant is not unavailable as a witness if his exemption, refusal, claim of lack of memory, inability, or absence is due to the procurement or wrongdoing of the proponent of his statement for the purpose of preventing the witness from attending or testifying.

Hearsay exceptions. — The following are not excluded by the hearsay rule if the declarant is unavailable as a witness:

Former Testimony. — Testimony given as a witness at another hearing of the same or a different proceeding, or in a deposition taken in compliance with law in the course of the same or another proceeding, if the party against whom the testimony is now offered, or, in a civil action or proceeding, a predecessor in interest, had an opportunity and similar motive to develop the testimony by direct, cross, or redirect examination.

Statement Under Belief of Impending Death. — A statement made by a declarant while believing that his death was imminent, concerning the cause or circumstances of what he believed to be his impending death.

Statement Against Interest. — A statement which was at the time of its making so far contrary to the declarant's pecuniary or proprietary interest, or so far tended to subject him to civil or criminal liability, or to render invalid a claim by him against another, that a reasonable man in his position would not have made the statement unless he believed it to be true. A statement tending to expose the declarant to criminal liability is not admissible in a criminal case unless corroborating circumstances clearly indicate the trustworthiness of the statement.

Statement of Personal or Family History. — (A) A statement concerning the declarant's own birth, adoption, marriage, divorce, legitimacy, relationship by blood, adoption, or marriage, ancestry, or other similar fact of personal or family history, even though declarant had no means of acquiring personal knowledge of the matter stated; or (B) a statement concerning the foregoing matters, and death also, of another person, if the declarant was related to the other by blood, adoption, or marriage or was so intimately associated with the other's family as to be likely to haveaccurate information concerning the matter declared.

Other Exceptions. — A statement not specifically covered by any of the foregoing exceptions but having equivalent circumstantial guarantees of trustworthiness, if the court determines that (A) the statement is offered as evidence of a material fact; (B) the statement is more probative on the point for which it is offered than any other evidence which the proponent can procure through reasonable efforts; and (C) the general purposes of these rules and the interests of justice will best be served by admission of the statement into evidence. However, a statement may not be admitted under this exception unless the proponent of it gives written notice stating his intention to offer the statement and the particulars of it, including the name and address of the declarant, to the adverse party sufficiently in advance of offering the statement to provide the adverse party with a fair opportunity to prepare to meet the statement.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 804 except for the last sentence of Exception (3), which is discussed below.

Subdivision (a) defines unavailability. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The definition of unavailability implements the division of hearsay exceptions into two categories by Rules 803 and 804(b).

At common law the unavailability requirement was evolved in connection with particular hearsay exceptions rather than along general lines. * * * However, no reason is apparent for making distinctions as to what satisfies unavailability for the different exceptions. The treatment in the rule is therefore uniform. * * *

Five instances of unavailability are specified:

Substantial authority supports the position that exercise of a claim of privilege by the declarant satisfies the requirement of unavailability (usually in connection with former testimony). * * * A ruling by the judge is required, which clearly implies that an actual claim of privilege must be made.

A witness is rendered unavailable if he simply refuses to testify concerning the subject matter of his statement despite judicial pressures to do so, a position supported by similar considerations of practicality. * * *

The position that a claimed lack of memory by the witness of the subject matter of his statement constitutes unavailability likewise finds support in the cases, though not without dissent. If the claim is successful, the practical effect is to put the testimony beyond reach, as in the other instances. In this instance, however, it will be noted that the lack of memory must be established by the testimony of the witness himself, which clearly contemplates his production and subjection to cross-examination.

Death and infirmity find general recognition as grounds. * * *

Absence from the hearing coupled with inability to compel attendance by process or other reasonable means also satisfies the requirement. * * *

If the conditions otherwise constituting unavailability result from procurement or wrongdoing of the proponent of the statement, the requirement is not satisfied. The rule contains no requirement that an attempt be made to take the deposition of a declarant.”

Under North Carolina law the unavailability requirement varies with respect to particular hearsay requirements.

Under the hearsay exception for former testimony, North Carolina courts recognize grounds (1), (4), and (5).
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 145 (1982). Although grounds (2) and (3) are not explicitly accepted or rejected by existing North Carolina precedents, Professor Brandis asserts that they should be accepted when occasion arises.

Id.

at 575.

Under the hearsay exception for dying declarations,

G.S. 8-51.1

requires that the declarant be dead.

Under the exception for statements against interest, apparently any legitimate reason for unavailability is sufficient.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 147, at 589, n. 80 (1982).

With respect to statements of family history, it was said in the older cases that the declarant must be dead. However, Professor Brandis asserts that any legitimate reason for unavailability should be acceptable.
Id.
at 597.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“If the conditions otherwise constituting unavailability result from the procurement or wrongdoing of the proponent of the statement, the requirement is not satisfied. The rule contains no requirement that an attempt be made to take the deposition of a declarant.”

Exception (1) concerns former testimony.

In North Carolina, the “testimony must have been given at a former trial of the same cause, or a preliminary stage of the same cause, or the trial of another cause involving the issue and subject matter to which the testimony is directed at the current trial.”
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 145, at 575-76 (1982) (footnotes omitted). The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The common law did not limit the admissibility of former testimony to that given in an earlier trial of the same case, although it did require identity of issues as a means of insuring that the former handling of the witness was the equivalent of what would now be done if the opportunity were presented. Modern decisions reduce the requirement to ‘substantial’ identity. McCormick § 233. Since identity of issues is significant only in that it bears on motive and interest in developing fully the testimony of the witness, expressing the matter in the latter terms is preferable.
Id.
”

Also, the Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Under the exception, the testimony may be offered (1) against the party
against
whom it was previously offered or (2) against the party

by

whom it was previously offered. In each instance the question resolves itself into whether fairness allows imposing, upon the party against whom now offered, the handling of the witness on the earlier occasion. (1) If the party against whom now offered is the one

against

whom the testimony was offered previously, no unfairness is apparent in requiring him to accept his own prior conduct of cross-examination or decision not to cross-examine. Only demeanor has been lost, and that is inherent in the situation. (2) If the party against whom now offered is the one

by

whom the testimony was offered previously, a satisfactory answer becomes somewhat more difficult. One possibility is to proceed somewhat along the line of an adoptive admission, i.e., by offering the testimony proponent in effect adopts it. However, this theory savors of discarded concepts of witnesses’ belonging to a party, of litigants’ ability to pick and choose witnesses, and of vouching for one’s own witnesses. * * * A more direct and acceptable approach is simply to recognize direct and redirect examination of one’s own witness as the equivalent of cross-examining an opponent’s witness. * * * Allowable techniques for dealing with hostile, double-crossing, forgetful, and mentally deficient witnesses leave no substance to a claim that one could not adequately develop his own witness at the former hearing. An even less appealing argument is presented when failure to develop fully was the result of a deliberate choice.”

North Carolina practice currently permits testimony against the party
against
whom it was offered.

Brandis on North Carolina Evidence

§ 145, at 577 (1982). There are no North Carolina cases concerning testimony offered against the party

by

whom it was previously offered.

With respect to identity of the parties, the Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“As a further assurance of fairness in thrusting upon a party the prior handling of the witness, the common law also insisted upon identity of parties, deviating only to the extent of allowing substitution of successors in a narrowly construed privity. Mutuality as an aspect of identity is now generally discredited, and the requirement of identity of the offering party disappears except as it might affect motive to develop the testimony. * * * The question remains whether strict identity, or privity, should continue as a requirement with respect to the party against whom offered.”

North Carolina practice apparently departs from the privity requirement to the extent of allowing former testimony “if the party against whom it was admitted had not merely an opportunity for cross-examination but the same motive for cross-examination as the party against whom it is offered.”
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 145, at 577 (1982). Exception (1) permits former testimony in civil cases if a predecessor in interest had an opportunity and similar motive to develop the testimony.

Under certain circumstances, Exception (1) permits a broader use of depositions than does N.C. Civ. Pro. Rule 32. See also

G.S. 8-83

.

Exception (2) differs from Fed. R. Evid. 804(b)(2) in that it omits the phrase “In a prosecution for homicide or in a civil action or proceeding”.

The exception is similar to

G.S. 8-51.1

. Unlike Fed. R. Evid. 804(b)(2) which limits admissibility of dying declarations in criminal cases to homicide prosecution, Exception (2) and

G.S. 8-51.1

permit dying declarations to be admitted in all types of criminal and civil actions and proceedings. Under G.S. 8-51.1 the declarant must have died from the causes or circumstances on which he commented. Upon adoption of Exception (2), G.S. 8-51.1 should be repealed.

Exception (3) concerns statements against interest and differs from Fed. R. Evid. 804(b)(3) as noted below. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The circumstantial guaranty of reliability for declarations against interest is the assumption that persons do not make statements which are damaging to themselves unless satisfied for good reason that they are true. * * * If the statement is that of a party, offered by his opponent, it comes in as an admission, * * * and there is no occasion to inquire whether it is against interest, this not being a condition precedent to admissibility of admissions by opponents.”

North Carolina cases have recognized declarations against pecuniary or proprietary interest as an exception to the hearsay rule. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 147 (1982). In

State v. Haywood,

295 N.C. 709

, the North Carolina Supreme Court abandoned the Court’s previous approach that excluded from the exception declarations against penal interest.

The last sentence of Fed. R. Evid. 804(b)(3) provides that: “A statement tending to expose the declarant to criminal liability and offered to exculpate the accused is not admissible unless corroborating circumstances clearly indicate the trustworthiness of the statement.” Requiring corroborating circumstances to indicate clearly the trustworthiness of statements exculpating the accused while imposing no such requirement with respect to statements implicating the accused raises serious constitutional questions. Accordingly, Exception (3) differs from Fed. R. Evid. 804(b) (3) in that it imposes the requirement of corroborating circumstances with respect to both exculpating and implicating statements.

In
Haywood,
the Court listed several very restrictive requirements that a declaration against penal interest must meet. The exception should not be construed to add requirements in addition to the requirement that “corroborating circumstances clearly indicate the trustworthiness of the statement.” As the Advisory Committee’s Note states: “The requirement of corroboration should be construed in such a manner as to effectuate its purpose of circumventing fabrication.”

Declarations against penal interests are admissible in both criminal and civil cases. However, the requirement of corroborating circumstances applies only in criminal cases.

The exception does not purport to deal with questions of the right to confrontation.

Exception (4) concerns statements of personal or family history.

The common law requirement in North Carolina that a declaration in this area must have been made before the beginning of the controversy was dropped in Fed. R. Evid. 804(b) (3), which is identical to this exception, as bearing more appropriately on weight than admissibility. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 149 (1982); Advisory Committee’s Note. Unlike North Carolina law that requires that the declarant be dead, Rule 804 merely requires that the declarant be unavailable. See

Brandis, supra.

The first part of the rule specifically disclaims any need of firsthand knowledge respecting declarant’s own personal history. Advisory Committee’s Note.

The second part of the rule deals with declarations concerning the history of another person. North Carolina common law provides that the declarant is qualified if related by blood or marriage.
Brandis, supra.
In addition, and contrary to the common law in North Carolina, the declarant qualifies under the exception by virtue of intimate association with the family.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states that: “The requirement sometimes encountered that when the subject of the statement is the relationship between two other persons the declarant must qualify as to both is omitted. Relationship is reciprocal.” There are no North Carolina cases on this point.

Exception (5) is identical to Rule 803(24) and differs from the federal rule. See commentary to Rule 803(24).

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “State v. Smith: Facilitating the Admissibility of Hearsay Statements in Child Sexual Abuse Cases,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1352 (1986).

For article, “Guilty by Intuition: The Insufficiency of Prior Inconsistent Statements To Convict,” see 65 N.C.L. Rev. 1 (1986).

For article, “Not So ‘Firmly Rooted’: Exceptions to the Confrontation Clause,” see 66 N.C.L. Rev. 1 (1987).

For note, “North Carolina Relaxes Foundation Requirements for Mitigating Evidence in Capital Sentencing Hearings,” see 66 N.C.L. Rev. 1221 (1988).

For note, “Criminal Procedure — Presumed Guilty: The Use of Videotaped and Closed-Circuit Televised Testimony in Child Sex Abuse Prosecutions and the Defendant’s Right to Confrontation — Coy v. Iowa,” see 11 Campbell L. Rev. 381 (1989).

For note, “Constitutional Admissibility of Hearsay Under the Confrontation Clause: Reliability Requirement for Hearsay Admitted Under a Non-‘Firmly Rooted’ Exception,” see 14 Campbell L. Rev. 347 (1993).

For article, “Confrontation and Hearsay: New Wine in An Old Bottle,” 16 Campbell L. Rev. 1 (1994).

For article, “Issues Once Moot: The Other Evidentiary Objections to the Admission of Exculpatory Polygraph Examinations,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1045 (1997).

For note, “State v. Alston: North Carolina Continues to Broaden its Mind to Admissibility of a Victim’s Out-of-Court Statements Under the Rule 803(3) Hearsay Exception in Criminal Cases,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1327 (1997).

For note, “Not-So-Secrets? The State of the Attorney-Client Privilege in North Carolina in the Wake of In re Investigation of Death of Eric Miller and Crawford v. Washington,” see 83 N.C. L. Rev. 1591 (2005).

For note, “Making Waves in a Sea of Uncertainty: Howerton Muddies the Waters of Expert Testimony Admissibility Standards in North Carolina,” see 83 N.C. L. Rev. 1613 (2005).

Rule 805.
Hearsay within hearsay.

Hearsay included within hearsay is not excluded under the hearsay rule if each part of the combined statements conforms with an exception to the hearsay rule provided in these rules.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 805. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“On principle it scarcely seems open to doubt that the hearsay rule should not call for exclusion of a hearsay statement which includes a further hearsay statement when both conform to the requirements of a hearsay exception. Thus a hospital record might contain an entry of the patient’s age based on information furnished by his wife. The hospital record would qualify as a regular entry except that the person who furnished the information was not acting in the routine of the business. However, her statement independently qualifies as a statement of pedigree (if she is unavailable) or as a statement made for purposes of diagnosis or treatment, and hence each link in the chain falls under sufficient assurance. Or, further to illustrate, a dying declaration may incorporate a declaration against interest by another declarant. See McCormick § 290, p. 611.”

Rule 805 is consistent with North Carolina practice. See, e.g.,
State
v.

Connley,

295 N.C. 327

(1978).

Rule 806.
Attacking and supporting credibility of declarant.

When a hearsay statement has been admitted in evidence, the credibility of the declarant may be attacked, and if attacked may be supported, by any evidence which would be admissible for those purposes if declarant had testified as a witness. Evidence of a statement or conduct by the declarant at any time, inconsistent with his hearsay statement, is not subject to any requirement that he may have been afforded an opportunity to deny or explain. If the party against whom a hearsay statement has been admitted calls the declarant as a witness, the party is entitled to examine him on the statement as if under cross-examination.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 806 except that the phrase “or a statement defined in 801(d)(2)(C), (D), or (E)” has been omitted from the first sentence. Fed. R. Evid. 801 treats admissions by a party-opponent as statements that are not hearsay. Since Rule 801 treats such statements as exceptions to the hearsay rule, the above phrase is superfluous.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The declarant of a hearsay statement which is admitted in evidence is in effect a witness. His credibility should in fairness be subject to impeachment and support as though he had in fact testified. See Rules 608 and 609. There are however, some special aspects of the impeaching of a hearsay declarant which require consideration. These special aspects center upon impeachment by inconsistent statement, arise from factual differences which exist between the use of hearsay and an actual witness and also between various kinds of hearsay, and involve the question of applying to declarants the general rule disallowing evidence of an inconsistent statement to impeach a witness unless he is afforded an opportunity to deny or explain. * * *

The principal difference between using hearsay and an actual witness is that the inconsistent statement will in the case of the witness almost inevitably of necessity in the nature of things be a prior statement, which it is entirely possible and feasible to call to his attention, while in the case of hearsay the inconsistent statement may well be a subsequent one, which practically precludes calling it to the attention of the declarant. The result of insisting upon observation of this impossible requirement in the hearsay situation is to deny the opponent, already barred from cross-examination, any benefit of this important technique of impeachment. The writers favor allowing the subsequent statement. McCormick § 37, p. 69; 3 Wigmore § 1033. * * *

When the impeaching statement was made prior to the hearsay statement, differences in the kinds of hearsay appear which arguably may justify differences in treatment. If the hearsay consisted of a simple statement by the witness, e.g., a dying declaration or a declaration against interest, the feasibility of affording him an opportunity to deny or explain encounters the same practical impossibility as where the statement is a subsequent one, just discussed, although here the impossibility arises from the total absence of anything resembling a hearing at which the matter could be put to him. The courts by a large majority have ruled in favor of allowing the statement to be used, under these circumstances. McCormick § 37, p. 69; 3 Wigmore § 1033. If, however, the hearsay consists of former testimony or a deposition, the possibility of calling the prior statement to the attention of the witness or deponent is not ruled out, since the opportunity to cross-examine was available. It might thus be concluded that with former testimony or depositions the conventional foundation should be insisted upon. Most of the cases involve depositions, and Wigmore describes them as divided. 3 Wigmore § 1031. Deposition procedures at best are cumbersome and expensive, and to require the laying of the foundation may impose an undue burden. Under the federal practice, there is no way of knowing with certainty at the time of taking a deposition whether it is merely for discovery or will ultimately end up in evidence. With respect to both former testimony and depositions the possibility exists that knowledge of the statement might not be acquired until after the time of the cross-examination. Moreover, the expanded admissibility of former testimony and depositions under Rule 804(b)(1) calls for a correspondingly expanded approach to impeachment. The rule dispenses with the requirement in all hearsay situations, which is readily administered and best calculated to lead to fair results.”

In
Hooper
v.

Moore,

48 N.C. 428

(1856), the court stated that in order to impeach the credibility of a declarant by showing an inconsistent statement made before the time when a deposition was taken, the declarant must be given an opportunity to explain. Professor Brandis is uncertain whether the requirement of an opportunity to explain bars proof of statements or conduct showing bias on the part of a hearsay declarant not present to testify; but in his view it should not.

Brandis on North Carolina Evidence

§ 48, p. 183 (1982).

The provision for cross-examination of a declarant upon his hearsay statement is a corollary of general principles of cross-examination and is consistent with North Carolina practice. See N.C. Civ. Pro. Rule 32(c).

Legal Periodicals.

For a practice-oriented discussion of impeachment of hearsay declarants by trial judges and attorneys, see 13 Campbell L. Rev. 157 (1991).

For recent development, “The Defense Calls ... the Accuser? State v. Brigman and How the North Carolina Court of Appeals Misconstrued Crawford’s Application to Available Witnesses,” see 84 N.C. L. Rev. 2082 (2006).